California, session 20252026, AB2364.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 50990 of the Government Code is amended to read:50990. (a) This chapter shall be known, known and may be cited, cited as the “Short-Term Rental Facilitator Act of 2025.”(b) This chapter shall only apply to a local agency that adopts an ordinance that makes the provisions of this chapter applicable within its jurisdictional boundaries.